Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-1734
Application process; legislative intent; common assessment tool.

It is the intent of the Legislature that the agencies enumerated in section 68-1732, whenever possible, shall develop a uniform, consolidated, and streamlined application process for all programs serving children and families. The application process shall be electronically linked so families will not have to repeat the application process. The state shall assist communities and eliminate barriers in developing a common application form and make the form available across the state. The application process shall provide for common data collection, intake, referral, and assessment and shall be ongoing. A single common assessment tool shall be developed which captures information once for use in making the full range of state, local, and community support available as part of the cash assistance program established under the Welfare Reform Act.

Laws 1994, LB 1224, § 34.